en: Prime Seedless grapes, Prime grapes
da: Prime Seedless-vindruer
sv: Prime Seedless-vindruvor

en: Fresh Prime Seedless grapes
da: Friske Prime Seedless-vindruer
sv: Färska Prime Seedless-vindruvor

en: Kakis
es: Caquis, Kakis
fr: Kakis
hr: Kakis
la: Diospyros kaki
nl: Kakis

en: Dried Kakis
fr: Kakis séchés

en: Persimmon pulp
fr: Pulpe de kaki

en: Immature tamarind pulp
fr: Pulpe de tamarin vert
hr: Nezrela pulpa tamarinde
nl: Onrijpe tamarinde pulp

en: Golden berries
fr: Physalis
hr: Zlatne bobice
nl: Physalis, Kaapse goudbessen

en: Kiwifruits, Kiwis, Kiwi fruits
af: Kiwivrug
an: Kiwi
ar: كيوي
az: Kivi
be: Ківі, садавіна
bg: Киви
bi: Kiwe
bn: কিউই ফল
bo: སྤྲེལ་ཁམ།
br: Kiwi
bs: Kivi
ca: Kiwi
cs: Kiwi
cy: Ffrwyth ciwi
da: Kiwifrugter, Kiwier
de: Kiwifrüchte, Kiwis
el: Ακτινίδιο
eo: Kivifruktoj
es: Kiwis
et: Kiivi
eu: Kiwi
fa: کیوی
fi: Kiivihedelmät
fr: Kiwis
ga: Cíobhaí
gl: Kiwi
hi: कीवी फल
hr: Kivi, Aktinidija
ht: Kiwi
hu: Kivi
hy: Կիվի
id: Buah kiwi
is: Kíví
it: Kiwi
ja: キウイフルーツ, キウイ, キウィー, キーウィー, キーウィ, キウィ
jv: Kiwi
ka: Კივი
kk: Киви жемісі
kn: ಕೀವಿಹಣ್ಣು
ko: 참다래
ky: Киви
la: Actinidiae fructus
lb: Kiwi
lt: Kiviai, Kivis
lv: Kivi
mi: Huakiwi
mk: Киви
ml: കിവി പഴം
mr: किवी
ms: Buah Kiwi
my: ကီဝီသီး
nb: Kiwier, Kiwifrukter
ne: ठेकीफल
nl: Kiwis
nn: Kiwiar, Kiwifrukter
nv: Chʼil dishooí
oc: Kiwi
pa: ਕੀਵੀ
pl: Kiwi
pt: Quiuí
ro: Kiwi
ru: Киви
sh: Kivi
sk: Kivi
sl: Kivi
sr: Киви
su: Buah kiwi
sv: Kiwifrukter, Kiwier, Kiwis
ta: பசலிப்பழம்
th: กีวี
ti: ኪዊ
tr: Kivi
tt: Киви
uk: Ківі
ur: کيوی
uz: Kivi (meva)
vi: Quả dương đào
zh: 猕猴桃
zu: Kiwifruit

en: Fresh kiwifruits, fresh kiwis
de: Frische Kiwis
es: Kiwi fresco
fr: Kiwis frais
hr: Svježi kivi
lt: Švieži kiviai

en: Kiwifruit pulp and seeds, Kiwi fruit pulp and seeds
fr: Pulpe et graines de kiwi

en: Dried kiwifruits, Dried kiwis
da: Tørrede kiwifrugter
fr: Kiwis séchés
sv: Torkade kiwifrukter

en: Frozen kiwifruits, Frozen kiwis
da: Frosne kiwifrugter
fr: Kiwis surgelés
sv: Frysta kiwifrukter

en: Green kiwifruits, Green kiwis
da: Grønne kiwifrugter
fr: Kiwis verts
ja: グリーンキウイ
ko: 그린키위
mi: Hua kiwi kākāriki
sv: Gröna kiwifrukter
th: กีวีสีเขียว
vi: Kiwi Xanh
zh: 绿肉猕猴桃

en: Yellow kiwifruits, Yellow kiwis, Gold kiwifruits, Gold kiwis, Kiwi Gold
da: Gule kiwifrugter
es: Kiwi Gold
fr: Kiwis jaunes, Kiwi jaune, Kiwi doré
ja: ゴールドキウイ
ko: 골드키위
pl: Złote kiwi
sv: Gula kiwifruktar
vi: Kiwi vàng
zh: 黃金奇異果

en: Hayward kiwifruits, Hayward kiwis
xx: Hayward
da: Hayward-kiwifrugter
ja: ヘイワード
la: Actinidia chinensis var. deliciosa ‘Hayward’
sv: Hayward-kiwifrukter
zh: 海沃德

en: Fresh Hayward kiwifruits
da: Friske Hayward-kiwifrugter
sv: Färska Hayward-kiwifrukter

en: Sungold, Jingold
xx: Sungold
es: Sungold, Sungold a polpa gialla
fr: Sungold, Kiwi jaune Sungold

en: Organic SunGold
es: Kiwi Zespri Eco

en: Peaches, Peach
ar: دراق
bg: Праскови
br: Pechez
ca: Préssec
ce: ГӀаммагӀа
cs: Broskev
da: Ferskner, Ferskener, Ferskenfrugter
de: Pfirsiche
el: Ροδάκινο
eo: Persikoj
es: Melocotones, Melocotón
eu: Mertxika
fi: Persikat, Persikka
fr: Pêches
gl: Pexego
hr: Breskve
hy: Դեղձ
ia: Persica
it: Pesche, Pesca
ja: モモ, もも, 桃, ピーチ
kk: Шабдалы
ko: 복숭아
lb: Piisch
lt: Persikai
mg: Paiso
my: မက်မွန်
nb: Ferskener
nl: Perziken
nn: Ferskenar
oc: Persec
pl: Brzoskwinia
ru: Персик
se: Persihkka
sk: Broskyňa
sl: Breskev
sv: Persikor, Persika
tg: Шафтолу
tr: Şeftali
tt: Шәфталу
zh: 桃

en: Fresh peaches
da: Friske ferskner
es: Melocotones frescos
fr: Pêches fraîches
hr: Svježe breskve
lt: Švieži persikai
sv: Färska persikor